District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
35 act may be cited as the “Board of Elections Certification of ANC Vacancies Amendment Act of
36 2025”.
37 Sec. 2. The Advisory Neighborhood Councils Act of 1975, effective October 10, 1975
38 (D.C. Law 1-21; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
39 (a) Section 8 is amended as follows:
40 (1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
1

41 “(a) General elections of members of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions shall take
42 place on the 1st Tuesday after the 1st Monday in November of each even-numbered calendar
43 year.”.
44 (2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
45 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
46 “(1) Each member of an Advisory Neighborhood Commission elected in a general
47 election shall serve for a term of 2 years which shall begin at noon on the 2nd day of January
48 next following the date of election of such member. A member of an Advisory Neighborhood
49 Commission filling a vacancy shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term beginning at noon
50 on the day after the date the Board certifies the election or appointment of such member.”.
51 (B) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
52 (3) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
53 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the word “exists” and inserting
54 the word “occurs” in its place.
55 (B) Paragraphs (2) and (3) are amended to read as follows:
56 “(2) For the purposes of this section, a vacancy is deemed to occur upon the
57 effective date of a notice of resignation or when the Board receives a notice of resignation,
58 whichever is later, or when the Board issues a final determination that a Commissioner no longer
59 meets the qualifications set forth in section 6(a). The Board shall publish notice of the vacancy in
60 the District of Columbia Register within 15 business days after the Board receives the notice of
61 resignation or issues a final determination that a Commissioner no longer meets the
62 qualifications set forth in section 6(a).
2

63 “(3) Except when a vacancy occurs within the 6-month period prior to a general
64 election, within 60 business days after the date that the Board publishes notice of a vacancy, the
65 affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission shall hold a public meeting to fill the vacancy
66 pursuant to paragraph (6) of this subsection.”.
67 (C) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “until a successor has
68 been certified and sworn in pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.” and inserting the phrase
69 “serve for the remainder of the term.” in its place.
70 (D) Paragraph (6) is amended to read as follows:
71 “(6)(A) Within 5 business days after the date that the Board publishes the notice
72 of vacancy in the District of Columbia Register, the Board shall make available petitions for the
73 purpose of obtaining the signatures of registered qualified electors within the affected single-
74 member district.
75 “(B) The petition form shall:
76 “(i) Be made available electronically to any person who files a
77 Declaration of Candidacy with the Board and is confirmed by the Board to be a registered
78 qualified elector residing in the affected single-member district.
79 “(ii) Include an affidavit to be signed and dated by the circulator of
80 the petition indicating that they witnessed each signature and did not write, alter, correct, clarify,
81 or obscure any information about the signer of the petition after the signer affixed their signature
82 to the petition.
83 “(iii) Include a notice that the signature line must be completed in
84 full by a registered qualified elector residing in the affected single-member district and any
85 misrepresentation of name or address may result in a civil fine or criminal prosecution.
3

86 “(C) Within 20 business days after the date that the Board makes the
87 petitions available, persons interested in filling the vacancy shall submit a petition to the Board
88 that contains the signatures of at least 25 registered qualified electors within the affected single-
89 member district. Within one business day after petitions are due, the Board shall publish on its
90 website a list of names of persons who submitted petitions and instructions for challenging a
91 petition. After a 5-business-day challenge period, the Board shall publish on its website a list of
92 the names of persons who submitted petitions who qualify for membership on the affected
93 Advisory Neighborhood Commission.
94 “(D) If there is only one person qualified to fill the vacancy within the
95 affected single-member district, the vacancy shall be deemed filled by the qualified person and
96 the Board shall certify the filling of the vacancy by publication in the District of Columbia
97 Register.
98 “(E)(i) If more than one candidate qualifies to fill the vacancy, the affected
99 Advisory Neighborhood Commission shall hold a public meeting to fill the vacancy. The
100 meeting may be held as a special meeting or as a regularly scheduled meeting, provided at least 2
101 Commissioners are present. The affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission shall notify all
102 qualified candidates at least 15 business days in advance of the meeting and shall post notice of
103 the meeting on their website.
104 “(ii) Each candidate qualified to fill the vacancy shall be afforded
105 at least 10 minutes to address the Commission, after which the Commissioners shall vote in open
106 session to select a candidate. A representative of the Board of Elections shall oversee voting and
107 declare the winner. In the event of a tie vote, the representative shall select a winner by casting
4

108 lots. The Board shall certify the filling of a vacancy pursuant to this subparagraph by publishing
109 notice in the District of Columbia Register.
110 “(iii) Notwithstanding sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph,
111 if the affected single-member district contains the Central Detention Facility and Correctional
112 Treatment Facility, the Board, in consultation with the OANC and the affected Advisory
113 Neighborhood Commission, shall make in-person voting available to qualified registered electors
114 within the single-member district who are not in the care and custody of the Department of
115 Corrections, and the Department of Corrections, in consultation with the Board, shall make
116 voting available to registered qualified electors in its care and custody, including by distributing
117 ballots to registered qualified electors listed as voters in the single-member district on the voter
118 registration list provided by the Board, collecting the ballots, and transmitting the ballots to the
119 Board.”.
120 (4) Subsection (e) is repealed.
121 (5) Subsection (f) is amended to read as follows:
122 “(f)(1) A member of an Advisory Neighborhood Commission who resigns from the
123 single-member district which the member represents shall submit a letter of resignation to the
124 Board and a copy of the letter to the Council, the Mayor, the OANC, the Chairperson of the
125 member’s Advisory Neighborhood Commission, and the Vice Chairperson of the member’s
126 Advisory Neighborhood Commission. The resignation letter shall be sworn, state that it is
127 irrevocable, and give the date that the resignation shall become effective, which shall be not
128 more than 60 business days after the date the Commissioner submits the letter to the Board. The
129 resignation letter may be submitted electronically provided the Commissioner uses the email
130 address submitted in the declaration of candidacy. The Board shall publish notice of the vacancy
5

131 and proceed to fill the vacancy as provided in subsection (d) of this section. A candidate who
132 fills a vacancy created by resignation shall begin their term no sooner than the effective date of
133 the resignation as indicated in the letter of resignation.
134 “(2) An Advisory Neighborhood Commission or the OANC may request the
135 Board declare a vacancy based on its own determination that a vacancy exists or that a
136 Commissioner no longer meets the qualifications for office under section (6)(a). The request
137 shall include evidence in support of the allegation and shall be sent to the Board of Elections. A
138 copy of the request shall be sent to the Council, the Mayor, and the Commissioner who is the
139 subject of the allegation.
140 “(3)(A)(i) Within 3 business days after receiving a request filed pursuant to
141 paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Board shall notify the Commissioner by certified mail of the
142 request for a vacancy determination. The notification shall include a copy of the request, the
143 deadline for challenging the request, and the date of a public meeting at which the Board intends
144 to issue a final determination. The Board shall also publish notice of the challenge period and
145 date of the public meeting on its website.
146 “(ii) The Commissioner who is the subject of a request filed
147 pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection may challenge the request by submitting a written
148 statement specifying the alleged errors of law and fact in the request within 15 days after the date
149 the Board publishes notice on its website.
150 “(iii) The Board shall send a copy of any challenge received to the
151 OANC and the affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission.
152 “(B) The Board shall issue a final determination at a public meeting held
153 not more than 30 business days after the challenge period has ended. The Board shall notify the
6

154 requestor and the Commissioner who is the subject of the request of the date of the meeting at
155 least 15 days in advance of the meeting and shall publish notice of the meeting on its website.
156 “(C) Within 5 business days after the issuance of the final determination of
157 the Board on the request, either the petitioner or the Commissioner who is the subject of the
158 request may apply to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals for a review of such
159 determination.
160 “(D) The District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall expedite
161 consideration of the determination.
162 “(4) The Board shall issue a notice of vacancy without regard to paragraphs (1) or
163 (2) of this subsection when:
164 “(A) The office of a Commissioner remains vacant after a general or
165 special election.
166 “(B) The Board determines, through its established procedures for the
167 maintenance of the voter registration roll, that a Commissioner is no longer a qualified elector
168 actually residing in the single-member district from which the Commissioner was elected;
169 provided, the affected commissioner has an opportunity to challenge the Board’s determination
170 as follows:
171 “(i) The Board shall notify the Commissioner by certified mail of
172 the residency determination and shall submit a copy of the notice to the affected Advisory
173 Neighborhood Commission and the OANC;
174 “(ii) The Commissioner may challenge the validity of the
175 determination by submitting a written statement specifying the alleged errors of law and fact of
176 the Board’s determination within 15 business days after the issuance of the determination;
7

177 “(iii) The Board shall issue a final determination of vacancy at a
178 public meeting held not more than 30 days after the challenge period has ended; and
179 “(iv) Within 5 business days after the issuance of the final
180 determination, the Commissioner who is the subject of the determination may apply to the
181 District of Columbia Court of Appeals for a review of such determination.”
182 “(v) The District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall expedite
183 consideration of the determination.”.
184 (6) Subsection (h) is amended to read as follows:
185 “(h)(1) The Board shall maintain a list of the names, a current telephone number, and
186 home addresses of all members of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, and shall transmit
187 that list to the OANC each month.
188 “(2) The Board and the OANC shall not publicly release the social security
189 numbers, personal electronic-mail addresses, or personal telephone numbers of the
190 Commissioners, except that the OANC may release the personal electronic-mail address or
191 personal telephone number upon the consent of the Commissioner.
192 “(3) The list required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
193 provided by the OANC to the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Board, the Historic Preservation
194 Review Board, the Redevelopment Land Agency, the Zoning Commission and the Board of
195 Zoning Adjustment, and to any other District government entity that requests it.
196 “(4) Any change to the list required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection,
197 which may be due to resignation, election, moving, or for any other reason, shall be reported by
198 the OANC, within 10 business days of receipt, to the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Board,
199 the Historic Preservation Review Board, the Redevelopment Land Agency, the Zoning
8

200 Commission and the Board of Zoning Adjustment, and to any other District government entity
201 that requests it.”.
202 (7) A new subsection (i) is added to read as follows:
203 “(i) The Board shall post all notices required to be published in the Register pursuant to
204 this section on its website.”.
205 (b) Section 14(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph (1D) to read as follows:
206 “(1D) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a quorum shall not be required for the
207 purposes of filling a vacancy pursuant to section 8.”.
208 Sec. 3. The Supplementary Neighborhood Commissions Act, effective June 19, 1976
209 (D.C. Law 1-72; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.31 et seq.), is repealed.
210 Sec. 4. Section 5(a) of the District of Columbia Election Code of 1955, approved August
211 12, 1955 (69 Stat. 699; D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.05(a)), is amended as follows:
212 (a) Paragraph (14) is amended by striking the phrase “and provide for the registration of
213 any political party seeking to nominate directly candidates in any general or special election.”
214 and inserting the phrase “provide for the registration of any political party seeking to nominate
215 directly candidates in any general or special election; and oversee the filling vacancies in an
216 Advisory Neighborhood Commission.” in its place.
217 (b) A new paragraph (22) to read as follows:
218 “(22) Oversee the filling of vacancies in an Advisory Neighborhood Commission
219 according to the procedures set forth in section 8 of the Advisory Neighborhood Councils Act of
220 1975, effective October 10, 1975 (D.C. Law 1-21; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.06).”.
221 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
222 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
9

223 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
224 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
225 Sec. 6. Effective date.
226 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
227 the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of Congressional
228 review as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
229 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(l)).
10